Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2124.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. The portion of United States highway 160 from the eastern
city limits of Argonia, then east on United States highway 160 to its
junction with Eden road is hereby designated as the CPL Monte Wayne
Forrest memorial highway. Upon compliance with K.S.A. 8-10,114 68-
10,114, and amendments thereto, the secretary of transportation shall place
highway signs along the highway right-of-way at proper intervals to
indicate that the highway is the CPL Monte Wayne Forrest memorial
highway.
Sec. 2. The portion of United States highway 77 from its junction
with interstate 70, then north on United States highway 77 in Geary
county to its western junction with United States highway 24 in Riley
county, then north on United States highway 77 from its eastern
junction with United States highway 24 to the junction with K-16
highway is hereby designated as the POW MIA memorial highway.
Upon compliance with K.S.A. 68-10,114, and amendments thereto, the
secretary of transportation shall place suitable signs along the
highway right-of-way at proper intervals to indicate that the highway
is the POW MIA memorial highway.
Sec. 3. Bridge No. 82-14-6.88 (026) located on K-82 highway in
Clay county is hereby designated as the POW MIA memorial bridge.
Upon compliance with K.S.A. 68-10,114, and amendments thereto, the
secretary of transportation shall place suitable signs to indicate that
such bridge is the POW MIA memorial bridge.
Sec. 2. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book Kansas register.